Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.046

Recording of board of directors' meetings.

The meetings of school district boards of directors are subject to the requirements of RCW 42.30.035(2).

[ 2023 c 67 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 67: See note following RCW 42.30.035.